Washington statutes.
RCW 5.45.900

Construction—1947 c 53.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

[ 1947 c 53 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 1263-3. Formerly RCW 5.44.120.]